Massachusetts, session 194th, S2789.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Any holder of an elective office in the town of Rutland may be recalled
therefrom by the registered voters of the town as hereinafter provided. No recall petition shall be
filed against an elected officer: (i) within 6 months after taking office; (ii) within 6 months of the
expiration of their elected term; or (iii) in the case of an officer subjected to a recall election and
not recalled thereby, until at least 6 months after the special recall election.
Section 2. (a) Two hundred (200) or more registered voters of the town of Rutland may
initiate the recall process by filing with the Town Clerk a recall affidavit signed under the
penalty of perjury. The recall affidavit shall contain the name and office of the officer sought to
be recalled and a statement of grounds of recall. The recall affidavit shall identify the person who
shall serve as the lead petitioner for interactions with the Town and the names of the first 10
signers of the recall affidavit, which names will be printed on the recall petition prepared under
section 4 of this act.
of 4

(b) If the elected Town Clerk is the subject of the recall affidavit, the assistant town clerk
shall perform the duties of the town clerk in connection with the recall affidavit, petition, and
special recall election; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of section 14 of
chapter 41 of the general laws, the Select Board may appoint a temporary town clerk to instead
perform the duties of the town clerk as specified in this subsection.
(c) The Town Clerk shall, within 3 business days following the date of such filing under
subsection (a), certify in writing thereon the number of signatures which are names of voters in
the town as of the date of such affidavit was filed with the Town Clerk.
Section 3. Upon certification by the Town Clerk, the Clerk shall, within 3 business days,
notify the lead petitioner by e-mail or telephone of the availability of petition blanks. The
petitions shall:
(i) bear facsimiles of the Clerk's signature and official seal;
(ii) be dated and addressed to the Select Board;
(iii) demand the recall of the name and office of the elected official to be subject to
recall and the grounds of recall as stated in the affidavit; and
(iv) demand the election of a successor to such office.
Said recall petition shall be returned and filed with the Clerk within 21 days following the
date the lead petitioner was notified of the availability of the petition and shall be signed by not
less than 10% of the qualified voters of the town as of the date the affidavit was filed with the
Clerk. Every signature must be accompanied by the signer's place of residence, giving the street
and number, and, if a multifamily dwelling, the particular dwelling unit. The Clerk shall
of 4

forthwith submit the recall petition to the Board of Registrars of Voters which board, within 5
business days after receipt, certify in writing thereon the number of signatures which are names
of voters in the town as of the date the recall affidavit was filed with the Clerk.
Section 4. If the petition shall be found and certified by the Board of Registrars of Voters
to be sufficient, the Town Clerk shall, not later than the next business day, submit with the
Clerk's certification therein to the Select Board. The Select Board shall forthwith give written
notice to said elected officer whose recall is being sought of the receipt of said certificate and, if
the officer sought to be removed does not resign within 5 business days, shall forthwith order a
recall election to be held on a day fixed by them not less than 64 calendar days nor more than
ninety (90) calendar days after the date the Select Board calls for the recall election. However, if
any other town election is to occur within 100 days after the date of said certificate, the Select
Board may, at its discretion, call for a special election to be held on the same date as the other
election. If a vacancy occurs in said office after a recall election has been so ordered, the election
shall nevertheless proceed as in this section provided.
Section 5. The incumbent shall continue to perform the duties of the office until the recall
election. ff the official is not recalled, the incumbent shall continue in the office for the
remainder of the unexpired term, subject to recall as before, except as provided in this act. ff the
official is recalled in the recall election, the official shall be deemed removed upon the election
of their successor, who shall hold office during the unexpired term. ff the successor fails to take
office within 10 business days after receiving notification of their election, the office shall be
deemed vacant and shall be filled in accordance with law.
of 4

Section 6. Ballots used in a recall election shall submit the following propositions in the
order indicated: For the recall of (name of official) from the office of ____
Against the recall of (name of official) from the office of _____
Immediately at the right of each proposition, there shall be an oval above which reads
"vote for one", or its equivalent. The voter, by filling in said oval, may vote for either of such
propositions. Under the propositions shall appear the words "Candidates" and the directions to
the voters as required by MGL Chapter 54, section 42. Beneath this, listed alphabetically, shall
appear the names of the candidates nominated as provided by law.
If a majority of the votes cast on the recall question is in favor of the recall, the elected
official shall be recalled and the ballots for the candidates shall be counted. The candidate who
received the higher number of votes shall be elected to the office. ff a majority of the votes cast
on the recall question is in the negative, the votes for candidates shall have no legal effect.
Section 7. Any elected official sought to be recalled shall not be a candidate to succeed
himself. The nomination of candidates, the publication of the warrant for the recall election, and
the conduct of the same shall all be in accordance with the provisions of law relating to elections
unless otherwise provided by this act.
Section 8. Any person who has been removed from an office under this act or who has
resigned from office following the issuance of recall petitions under section 4, and before the
certification of the results of the special recall election, shall not be appointed to any town office,
board, commission, or committee within 1 year after such removal or resignation.
Section 9. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4